Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 4 Clerks of Supreme and Superior Courts

8-4-1.
Clerk of supreme court.

There shall be a clerk of the supreme court, with an office in Providence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 48; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-1

.

8-4-2.
Appointment and term of supreme court clerk.

In the month of April and every five (5) years thereafter, the chief justice of the supreme court with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a clerk of the supreme court. The person so appointed shall hold office until the first day of May in the fifth year next after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 24, § 6; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1086; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 6; P.L. 1914, ch. 1035, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2442, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 3; P.L. 1956, ch. 3832, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 109, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 425, § 2.

8-4-3.
Vacancy in office of clerk.

In case of a vacancy in the office of the clerk of the supreme court from any cause, the chief justice shall appoint some person to fill such vacancy for the balance of the unexpired term and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2442, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-3

; P.L. 2003, ch. 267, § 1.

8-4-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 266, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 1996.

8-4-4.
Clerks of superior court.

There shall be a clerk of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol, and a clerk of the superior court for each of the counties of Newport, Washington, and Kent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 49; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1856, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-4

.

8-4-4.1.
Retirement of superior court clerks as clerks emeritus.

Any clerk of the superior court serving on or after May 16, 1984 and who retires from the position of clerk under the state retirement system after having served not less than nine (9) years in the position shall, upon such retirement, be deemed to be clerk emeritus of the superior court, shall retain the authority and power of a clerk of the superior court, including but not limited to the authority and power to join persons in marriage in any city or town in this state, and shall be available, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, for assignment for active duty as clerk of the superior court without additional compensation therefor by the presiding judge thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 435, § 1.

8-4-5.
Appointment, terms, and salaries of superior court clerks.

In the month of May, 1971, and in the month of January in 1976 and in every fifth year thereafter, the presiding justice of the superior court, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a clerk of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol, and a clerk of the superior court for each of the counties of Newport, Washington, and Kent. The persons so appointed shall hold office until the first day of February in the fifth year next after their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. They shall be entitled to the same longevity salary increases as though they were in the classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 720, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 6; P.L. 1932, ch. 1856, § 1; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2441, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-5

; P.L. 1968, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. IX, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 21, § 1.

8-4-6.
Vacancies in office of superior court clerk.

In case of a vacancy in the office of clerk of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol, or in the office of clerk of the superior court of either of the counties of Newport, Washington, or Kent, from any cause, the presiding justice of the superior court with the advice and consent of the senate shall appoint some person to fill such vacancy for the balance of the unexpired term and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 6; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2441, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-6

; P.L. 2005, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 21, § 1.

8-4-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 96, § 1. For present law see §

42-20-9

.

8-4-8.
General duties of clerks.

The superior court clerks shall constantly attend the sittings of their respective courts, shall keep the seal, books, and papers thereof, shall collect and receive all fines and costs in criminal cases, and all court fees in civil cases and shall account therefor as required by law, shall make fair entries and records of all the proceedings, judgments, orders, and decrees therein either in writing or by means of an electronic storage system or other data compilation system, shall furnish stationery to be allowed by the court for the use of the court, and shall do and perform all other things which by law or the rules of the court shall appertain to their office.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-8

; P.L. 1980, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 202, § 1.

8-4-9.
Duty to recite pleadings in record of judgment.

The superior court clerks shall, in the record of every judgment, recite the substance of the pleadings in the cause, except that the court may by general rule, general order, or special order direct in what manner and to what extent, if any, the pleadings in any or all causes which are entered in either of the courts shall be extended upon the records; and whenever, by accident, neglect, or otherwise, except by order of the court, any clerk shall have failed to record the proceedings of the court of which he or she is clerk, in any cause pending before it, the court may direct the acting clerk to record the proceedings, upon such evidence as may be satisfactory to it, giving notice to the parties interested, or their attorneys, whenever from the circumstances of the case the court may deem proper.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 52; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2168, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-9

.

8-4-10.
Indexing of judgment records.

The superior court clerks shall make or cause to be made two (2) indexes to every current book and electronic storage system or other data compilation system of records of judgments in their offices, one, an alphabetical index of the names of all the plaintiffs, complainants, or petitioners, giving also the names of the defendants or respondents, in each case; and the other, an alphabetical index of the names of all the defendants or respondents, giving also the names of the plaintiffs, complainants, or petitioners, in each case.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 53; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-10

; P.L. 1990, ch. 203, § 1.

8-4-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-11

; Repealed by P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 20.

8-4-12.
Appointment of clerk pro tempore.

In case of the death, resignation, absence, inability, or refusal to serve of any of the superior court clerks, the chief justice, or the presiding justice of the court in which the vacancy, or inability, or refusal to serve occurs, may appoint a clerk pro tempore, who shall hold his or her office until the clerk shall have returned or the inability shall have been removed or another clerk shall have been appointed to fill the vacancy and shall have qualified.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 55; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-12

.

8-4-13.
Qualification and compensation of clerk pro tempore.

The clerk appointed pursuant to §

8-4-12

shall be sworn and give bond before he or she enters upon the duties of his or her office and shall, during his or her term of service, be entitled to the compensation of the office.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-13

.

8-4-14.
Appointment of deputies.

The clerk of the supreme court, with the approval of the Chief Justice, may appoint one or more deputy clerks, who, being sworn, may discharge all the duties of the clerk appointing them.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 57; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-14

; P.L. 1981, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 311, § 1.

8-4-15.
Removal of deputies — Compensation — Liability for misconduct or neglect.

Each deputy clerk shall be removable at the pleasure of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court; and the supreme court clerk appointing him or her shall fix the amount of his or her compensation within the amount appropriated therefor and shall be liable for his misconduct or neglect of duty.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 58; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-15

; P.L. 1981, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 311, § 1.

8-4-16.
Assistant supreme court clerks.

The clerk of the supreme court shall appoint, with the approval of the court, not more than two (2) assistant clerks, who shall hold office until removed by the clerk or the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 59; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-16

.

8-4-17.
Appointment of assistant superior court clerks — Employment of clerical assistance by the presiding justice.

The presiding justice shall appoint as many assistant clerks as may be necessary, who shall hold office until removed by the presiding justice.

The presiding justice is hereby authorized and empowered to employ such clerical assistance in addition to assistant clerks as may be required in the clerk’s office in copying, recording, indexing, and attending upon the files of the court, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for this purpose; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer in payment for such assistance, upon proper vouchers approved and certified by the presiding justice or his or her designee.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 60; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 13; P.L. 1909, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1639, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1850, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2165, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 13; P.L. 1925, ch. 621, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 994, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1178, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1543, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-17

; P.L. 1981, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 311, § 1.

8-4-18.
Powers of assistants in Providence and Bristol counties.

Each of the assistant clerks for the counties of Providence and Bristol shall aid his principal in the discharge of his duties and any act done by him or her, under direction of the clerk, in the line of duty of the clerk, shall have the same force and effect as though done by the clerk; he or she shall have authority to administer oaths to parties, witnesses, and others as required in the conduct of the proceedings of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 61; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 14; P.L. 1930, ch. 1544, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-18

.

8-4-19.
Employment of clerical assistants in Kent, Washington, and Newport counties.

The clerks of the superior courts within the counties of Kent, Washington, and Newport may employ such clerical assistance in their respective offices as they may deem necessary, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for this purpose; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the clerk of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 62; P.L. 1908, ch. 1546, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, §§ 15, 17, 18; P.L. 1915, ch. 1196, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1390, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1731, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1786, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1918, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1934, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, §§ 15, 17, 18; P.L. 1930, ch. 1546, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1708, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-19

.

8-4-20.
Custody of files and records.

The files and records of the supreme court shall be in the custody of the clerk of the supreme court. The files and records now in the offices of the clerks of the superior court in the counties of Providence, Newport, Washington, and Kent, which were transferred to the offices from the appellate division and the common pleas division of the supreme court in those counties, shall be and remain, respectively, in the custody of the clerks of the superior court in each of those counties. The files and records in the office of the clerk of the superior court in Providence, including all books, papers, and records of the office and all other public property, which were transferred from the office of the assistant clerk of the superior court in Bristol to the office in Providence, shall there remain in the custody of the clerk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1327, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 276, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 16; P.L. 1932, ch. 1856, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 499, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

8-4-20

.

8-4-21.
General assistant clerks.

The presiding justice of the superior court shall appoint four (4) general assistant clerks, who shall hold office until removed by the presiding justice. Each of the general assistant clerks may be designated by the presiding justice for service in assisting any of the clerks of the superior court for the several counties throughout the state. When so designated, that general assistant clerk shall aid the clerk of the county or counties where he or she shall be so designated and any act done by him or her, under direction of the clerk of the county, in the line of duty of the clerk, shall have the same force and effect as though done by the clerk; each general assistant clerk shall have the authority in any county to administer oaths to parties, witnesses, and others, as required in the conduct of the proceedings of the court. The general assistant clerks may be advanced to the rank of deputy clerk by appointment of the presiding justice of the superior court and may in their capacities as deputy clerks be designated by the presiding justice for service in assisting any of the clerks of the superior court for the several counties throughout the state and may discharge all of the duties which could be performed by the clerk of the superior court for any county.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 311, § 1.